Hawaii statutes.
[§521-4] Construction against implicit
repeal. This chapter being a general law intended as a unified coverage of
its subject matter, no part of it shall be deemed to be impliedly repealed by
subsequent legislation if such construction can reasonably be avoided. [L 1972,
c 132, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next